Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1470.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The act of June 13, 1967 (P.L.31, No.21), known as the Human Services Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 449.3. Subscription Model for GLP-1 Agonists.--(a) The department shall seek a waiver from the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services of the United States Department of Health and Human Services to permit the Commonwealth to enter into value-based arrangements with drug manufacturers through supplemental rebate agreements for GLP-1 agonists used to treat obesity.(b) Subject to Federal approval, the department shall promulgate regulations to implement this section.123456789101112131415161718 (c) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"GLP-1 agonist." A type of medication which mimics the effect of the GLP hormone on the body, including the following effects:(1) Triggering insulin release from the pancreas.(2) Blocking glucagon secretion.(3) Slowing the emptying of the stomach.(4) Increasing how full an individual feels after eating."Supplemental rebate agreement." An agreement between the Commonwealth and a drug manufacturer which allows the Commonwealth to pay an agreed amount per treatment provided up to a cap, at which point treatments are provided at no cost to the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1470PN1731 - 2 - 12345678910111213141516